Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.110

Application fee.

Each applicant shall pay a fee determined by the secretary as provided in RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 1996 c 191 s 14; 1991 c 3 s 63; 1989 c 202 s 19; 1985 c 7 s 23; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 27; 1969 c 49 s 1; 1957 c 52 s 29. Prior: 1941 c 92 s 2, part; 1935 c 112 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 10031-4, part.]